Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1478
Receipt of rent free of obligation; prohibited.

A rental agreement, assignment, conveyance, trust deed, or security instrument may not permit the receipt of rent free of the obligation to comply with section 76-1492.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 29.